Utah statutes.
76-7-323.   Public funds for support entities providing contraceptive or abortion services restricted.

No agency of the state or its political subdivisions shall approve any application for funds of the state or its political subdivisions to support, directly or indirectly, any organization or health care provider that provides contraceptive or abortion services to an unmarried minor without the prior written consent of the minor's parent or guardian.  No institution shall be denied state or federal funds under relevant provisions of law on the ground that a person on its staff provides contraceptive or abortion services in that person's private practice outside of such institution.

